Nevada, session 83, SB286.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 321.640 is hereby amended to read as follows:
321.640 The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
1. It is in the public interest to place the primary authority for
the planning process with the local governments, which are closest
to the people;
2. Unregulated growth and development of the State will result
in harm to the public safety, health, comfort, convenience, resources
and general welfare;
3. The cities of the State have a responsibility for guiding the
development of areas within their respective boundaries for the
common good, and the counties have similar responsibilities with
respect to their unincorporated areas;
4. City, county, regional and other planning must be done in
harmony to ensure the orderly growth and preservation of the State;
and
5. State participation in land use planning should be limited to
coordination of information and data, the acquisition and use of
federal lands within the State, providing land use planning
assistance in areas of critical environmental concern when directed
by the Governor or requested by local governments, and providing
assistance in resolving inconsistencies between the land use plans of
local governmental entities when requested to do so by one of the
entities.
6. Tribal knowledge and expertise is an important source of
local knowledge and tribal governments and tribal members
should be consulted when local governments are engaged in the
planning process, including, without limitation, when:
(a) Considering approval for any project or activity proposed
to be conducted on state or public lands; and
-
*SB286*

– 3 –
(b) Consulting or coordinating with the Federal Government
or other local governments or local entities with regard to any
project or activity which is proposed to be conducted on state or
public lands.
Sec. 2. Chapter 277 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Tribal government” means a federally recognized American
Indian tribe pursuant to 25 C.F.R. §§ 83.1 to 83.12, inclusive.
Sec. 3. NRS 277.182 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277.182 NRS 277.182 to 277.188, inclusive, and section 2 of
this act may be cited as the State , [and] Local and Tribal
Government Cooperation Act.
Sec. 4. NRS 277.183 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277.183 As used in NRS 277.182 to 277.188, inclusive, and
section 2 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 277.184, 277.1855 and 277.186
and section 2 of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in
those sections.
Sec. 5. NRS 277.187 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277.187 1. It is the purpose of the State , [and] Local and
Tribal Government Cooperation Act to encourage communication,
cooperation and coordinated working relationships between state
agencies , [and] local governments [.] and tribal governments.
2. To carry out the purposes set forth in subsection 1:
(a) If a state agency intends to adopt a plan or an amendment
thereto, the state agency should, to the extent practicable:
(1) Inform local and tribal governments that may be affected
of the state agency’s intent to adopt a plan or amendment thereto.
(2) Solicit and consider comments from local and tribal
governments that may be affected by the plan or amendment thereto.
(3) If a local or tribal government informs the state agency
that the proposed plan or amendment thereto will be inconsistent or
incompatible with a plan of the local or tribal government, consider
whether the state agency can make the proposed plan or amendment
consistent or compatible with the plan of the local or tribal
government.
(b) If a local government intends to adopt a plan or an
amendment thereto, the local government should, to the extent
practicable:
(1) Inform state agencies and tribal governments that may
be affected of the local government’s intent to adopt a plan or
amendment thereto.
(2) Solicit and consider comments from state agencies and
tribal governments that may be affected by the plan or amendment
thereto.
-
*SB286*

– 4 –
(3) If a state agency or tribal government informs the local
government that the proposed plan or amendment thereto will be
inconsistent or incompatible with a plan of the state agency [,] or
tribal government, consider whether the local government can make
the proposed plan or amendment consistent or compatible with the
plan of the state agency [.] or tribal government.
3. In carrying out the provisions of this section with respect to
tribal governments, a state agency or local government should, to
the extent practicable, communicate, coordinate and cooperate
with tribal governments in accordance with the policy developed
by the Department of Native American Affairs pursuant to
NRS 233A.260.
Sec. 6. NRS 277.188 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277.188 Nothing in the State , [and] Local and Tribal
Government Cooperation Act shall be interpreted to limit the power
of a state agency or local government to carry out its statutory duties
and responsibilities.
Sec. 7. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
H
-
*SB286*